Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-113 Filing procedure. The
commissioner may adopt reasonable rules concerning the procedure for the filing
or submission of policies subject to this article as are necessary, proper, or
advisable to the administration of this article. Each filing shall be
accompanied by a $20 fee payable to the commissioner, which fee shall be
deposited in the commissioner's education and training fund. This provision
shall not abridge any other authority granted the commissioner by law. [L 1987,
c 347, pt of §2; am L 1988, c 363, §2(3)]

Cross References

Commissioner's education and training fund, see §431:2-214.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next